North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 11. Commercial Activity.

§ 18B-1100.
Commercial permits.

The Commission may issue the following commercial permits:

Unfortified winery

Fortified winery

Limited winery

Brewery

Distillery

Fuel alcohol

Wine importer

Wine wholesaler

Malt beverages importer

Malt beverages wholesaler

Bottler

Salesman

Vendor representative

Nonresident malt beverage vendor

Nonresident wine vendor

Winery special show

Liquor importer/bottler permit

Cider and vinegar manufacturer

Wine producer permit

Malt beverage special event permit.

Spirituous liquor special event permit.

Nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit.

Airport central storage permit.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 59; 1989, c. 737, s. 1; 1995, c. 404, s. 3; 1997-134, s. 1; 2001-262, s. 8; 2001-487, s. 49(g); 2009-377, s. 3; 2021-150, ss. 6.4(a), 19.3.

§ 18B-1101.
Authorization of unfortified winery permit.

The holder of an unfortified winery permit may:

Manufacture unfortified wine;

Sell, deliver and ship unfortified wine in closed containers to wholesalers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws, except that wine may be sold to exporters and nonresident wholesalers only when the purchase is not for resale in this State;

(2a)

Receive, in closed containers, unfortified wine produced inside or outside North Carolina under the winery’s label from grapes, berries, or other fruits owned by the winery, and sell, deliver, and ship that wine to wholesalers, exporters, and nonresident wholesalers in the same manner as its wine manufactured in North Carolina. This provision may be used only by a winery during its first three years of operation or when there is substantial damage to its grapes, berries, or other fruits from catastrophic crop loss. This provision may be used only three years out of every 10 years and notice must be given to the Commission each time this provision is used;

Ship its wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside this State in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 18B-1001

, 18B-1001.1, and 18B-1001.2, and other applicable provisions of this Chapter;

Furnish or sell “short-filled” packages, on which State taxes have been or will be paid, to its employees for the use of the employees or their families and guests in this State;

Regardless of the results of any local wine election, sell the wine owned by the winery at the winery for on- or off-premise consumption upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

;

Sell the wine manufactured by the winery or produced under the winery’s label under subdivision (2a) of this section for on- or off-premise consumption at no more than three other locations in the State, upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

;

(6a)

Receive, in closed containers, and sell at the winery, unfortified wine produced inside or outside North Carolina under contract with the winery. Such contract wine must have the winery’s name clearly displayed on each bottle. The contract wine may be sold also at affiliated retail outlets of the winery physically located on or adjacent to the winery. Any wine received by a winery under this provision must be made available for sale by the winery to wholesalers for distribution to retailers, without discrimination, in the same manner as if the wine were being imported by the winery;

Obtain a wine wholesaler permit to sell, deliver, and ship at wholesale unfortified wine manufactured at the winery. The authorization of this subdivision applies only to a winery that annually sells, to persons other than exporters and nonresident wholesalers when the purchase is not for resale in this State, no more than 100,000 gallons of unfortified wine manufactured by it at the winery;

Allow winemaking on premises as allowed by a permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001(17)

.

A sale under subdivision (4) shall not be considered a retail or wholesale sale under the ABC laws.

History.

1973, c. 511, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 411, s. 6; 1979, c. 224; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 60; 1985, c. 89, s. 4; 1989, c. 800, s. 2; 2001-262, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 49(b); 2002-102, s. 2; 2003-402, s. 6; 2004-135, s. 2; 2004-199, s. 11; 2007-402, s. 3.

§ 18B-1102.
Authorization of fortified winery permit.

The holder of a fortified winery permit may:

Manufacture, purchase, import and transport brandy and other ingredients and equipment used in the manufacture of fortified wine;

Sell, deliver and ship fortified wine in closed containers to wholesalers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws, except that wine may be sold to exporters and nonresident wholesalers only when the purchase is not for resale in this State;

Ship its wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside this State in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 18B-1001

, 18B-1001.1, and 18B-1001.2, and other applicable provisions of this Chapter;

Furnish or sell “short-filled” packages, on which State taxes have been or will be paid, to its employees for the use of the employees or their families and guests in this State;

Regardless of the results of any local wine election, sell the winery’s wine for on- or off-premise consumption upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

A sale under subdivision (4) shall not be considered a retail or wholesale sale under the ABC laws.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 411, s. 6; c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 511, ss. 1, 2; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 224; c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 60; 1985, c. 89, s. 5; 1989, c. 800, s. 3; 2003-402, s. 7.

§ 18B-1103.
Authorization of limited winery permit.

Special Qualifications. — Any winery which holds an unfortified winery permit and which produces its wine principally from honey, grapes or other fruit or grain grown in this State may obtain a limited winery permit.

Authorized Acts. — The holder of a limited winery permit may give visitors free tasting samples of the wine. The Commission may issue rules regulating these tastings.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 61.

§ 18B-1104.
Authorization of brewery permit.

Authorized Acts. — The holder of a brewery permit may:

Manufacture malt beverages.

Purchase malt, hops and other ingredients used in the manufacture of malt beverages.

Sell, deliver and ship malt beverages in closed containers to wholesalers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws, except that malt beverages may be sold to exporters and nonresident wholesalers only when the purchase is not for resale in this State. However, nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the holder of a brewery permit from selling malt beverages to a nonresident wholesaler, nonresident malt beverage vendor, bottler, or other similar party for resale in this State if the malt beverages are shipped from the brewery to wholesalers licensed under this Chapter.

Receive malt beverages manufactured by the permittee in some other state for transshipment to (i) dealers in other states or (ii) wholesalers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws.

Furnish or sell marketable malt beverage products, or packages which do not conform to the manufacturer’s marketing standards, if State taxes have been or will be paid, to its employees for the use of the employees or their families and guests in this State.

Give its products to customers, visitors, and employees for consumption on its premises. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as excluding customers and visitors at the brewery as part of a paid or complimentary tour of the brewery.

(6a)

Receive, in closed containers, and sell at the brewery, malt beverages produced inside or outside North Carolina under contract with a contract brewery. The contract brewery that manufactures the malt beverages shall be responsible for all aspects associated with manufacturing the product, subject to the rules of the Commission and the Department of Revenue. The brewery, not the contract brewery, shall be responsible for registering the contracted product with the Commission, submitting the appropriate reports regarding the malt beverages, and remitting the appropriate taxes if required by those rules. The contract malt beverages may be sold also at affiliated retail outlets of the brewery physically located on or adjacent to the brewery. Any malt beverages received from a contract brewery under this subdivision shall be made available for sale by the brewery to wholesalers for distribution to retailers, without discrimination, in the same manner as if the malt beverages were being imported by the brewery. Contract brewing is authorized between affiliated breweries, but shall not be used as a means to allocate production quantities between affiliated breweries to obtain a malt beverage wholesaler permit pursuant to subdivision (8) of this subsection where either brewery would not otherwise qualify for a permit, and the Commission shall have no authority to grant an exemption to this requirement pursuant to G.S. 18B-1116(b).

In an area where the sale of any type of alcoholic beverage is authorized by law, and upon receiving the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

, sell at the brewery, and any additional retail location authorized under subdivision (8) of this subsection, any or all of the following:

The brewery’s malt beverages that have been approved by the Commission for sale in North Carolina.

Malt beverages manufactured by the permittee in some other state that have been approved by the Commission for sale in North Carolina.

Any other alcoholic beverages approved by the Commission for sale in North Carolina, if sale of the alcoholic beverage is otherwise authorized in that area.

(7a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-182, s. 21(a), effective October 1, 2019.

(7b)

Regardless of the results of any local malt beverage election, sell the malt beverages owned by the brewery at the brewery for on- or off-premise consumption upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

Obtain a malt beverage wholesaler permit to sell, deliver, and ship at wholesale up to 50,000 barrels of malt beverages manufactured by the brewery per year to unaffiliated retail permittees. The authorization of this subdivision applies to a brewery that sells, to consumers at the brewery, to wholesalers, to retailers, and to exporters, fewer than 100,000 barrels of malt beverages produced by it per year. The barrelage limitations set forth in this subdivision apply regardless of the number or type of permits that may be issued to a brewery under this Chapter. A brewery not exceeding the sales quantity limitations in this subdivision may also sell the malt beverages manufactured by the brewery, and malt beverages produced under subdivision (6a) of this subsection, at not more than three other locations in the State, where the sale is legal, upon obtaining the appropriate permits under G.S. 18B-1001. A brewery operating any additional retail location pursuant to this subdivision under a different trade name than that used at the brewery shall also offer for sale at that location a reasonable selection of competitive malt beverage products. A sale at any additional retail location under this subdivision shall not be considered a wholesale sale for the purposes of Article 13 of this Chapter. Except as provided in G.S. 18B-1116(b), the Commission shall have no authority to grant an exemption to or otherwise allow a brewery permittee more than the three additional retail locations authorized by this subdivision. Malt beverages manufactured by a supplier permittee that owns five percent (5%) or more of a brewery permittee acting under the authority granted in this subdivision shall be included in determining whether the brewery permittee complies with the barrelage limitations set forth in this subdivision.

Sales or Gifts. — A sale or gift under subdivision (5) or (6) of subsection (a) of this section shall not be considered a retail or wholesale sale under the ABC laws.

Tax Compliance. — By October 1 of each year, the Commission shall confirm that the holder of a brewery permit is in compliance with G.S. 18B-900(a)(8). The provisions of G.S. 18B-900(f) apply to the confirmation required under this subsection, except that the Commission may suspend a person’s brewery permit until the Commission receives notice from the Department of Revenue that the person is in compliance.

Sales Report Upon Commission Request. — Within 60 days of a request by the Commission, a holder of a brewery permit who obtains a malt beverage wholesaler permit pursuant to subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section shall provide a sales report to the Commission. The report shall list separately all of the following for the 12-month period preceding the date of the request:

The number of barrels of malt beverages sold by the permit holder that were produced by the permit holder.

The quantity and dollar amount of malt beverages sold by the permit holder under subdivision (7) of subsection (a) of this section.

The quantity and dollar amount of malt beverages sold on-premises under subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section.

The quantity and dollar amount of malt beverages sold off-premises under subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section.

The quantity and dollar amount of malt beverages sold under

G.S. 18B-1114.5

.

The quantity and dollar amount of malt beverages destroyed, spoiled, or otherwise rendered unsalable.The Commission shall not request more than one sales report from a brewery within a 12-month period. The Commission shall keep all information provided pursuant to this subsection confidential except as required by law or requested by the Department of Revenue. The information shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term “barrels” is as defined in

G.S. 81A-9

.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1985, c. 596, s. 2; 1989, c. 800, s. 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 920, s. 9; 1993, c. 415, s. 20; 2003-430, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 29; 2011-107, s. 2; 2011-419, s. 1; 2015-98, s. 7; 2017-87, ss. 8, 12-16(a); 2019-18, s. 2; 2019-182, ss. 8(a), 21(a).

§ 18B-1105.
Authorization of distillery permit.

The holder of a distillery permit may do any of the following:

Manufacture, purchase, import, possess and transport ingredients and equipment used in the distillation or production of spirituous liquor. The authorization to possess ingredients set forth in this subdivision includes the possession of spirituous liquor not distilled or produced at the distillery that is used for the production, research and development, or sample comparison of spirituous liquor.

Sell, deliver and ship spirituous liquor in closed containers at wholesale to (i) exporters and local boards within the State, and, (ii) subject to the laws of other jurisdictions, at wholesale or retail to consumers in other states or nations, or private or public agencies or establishments of other states or nations, except that the holder of a distillery permit may not sell, deliver, or ship spirituous liquor at retail to consumers in jurisdictions that require reciprocity in order to allow such sales, deliveries, or shipments.

Transport into or out of the distillery the maximum amount of liquor allowed under federal law, if the transportation is related to the distilling process.

Sell spirituous liquor distilled or produced at the distillery in closed containers to visitors who tour the distillery for consumption off the premises. The length, content, and other parameters of the tour shall be at the discretion of the distillery, and the distillery shall not be required to maintain records related to tours. Sales under this subdivision are allowed only in a county where the establishment of a county or municipal ABC store has been approved pursuant to G.S. 18B-602(g) and may occur between the hours of 9:00 A.M. and 9:00 P.M. on Monday through Saturday of each week, from 12:00 noon to 9:00 P.M. on Sundays, and from 9:00 A.M. to 9:00 P.M. on each of the following holidays that do not fall on a Sunday: New Year’s Day, Fourth of July, Labor Day, and Thanksgiving Day. Spirituous liquor sold under this subdivision shall (i) be listed as a code item for sale in the State, (ii) be sold at the price set by the Commission for the code item pursuant to G.S. 18B-804(b), and (iii) have affixed to its bottle any labeling requirements set by law. A bottle of spirituous liquor sold under this subdivision may have personalized labeling. The personalized labeling shall comply with any other labeling requirements set by law. The personalized labeling shall not cover any portion of the manufacturer’s original label. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “personalized labeling” means the inclusion of any of the following on the label:

The name of the purchaser of the bottle or the name of any individual, business entity, club, ABC Board, or ABC store on whose behalf the bottle is purchased.

“Bottled for,” “distilled for,” “in honor of,” or other similar language.

Dates, locations, occasions, and other similar information.

(4a)

In an area where the sale of mixed beverages is authorized by law, sell mixed beverages for consumption on the premises. If a distillery elects to sell mixed beverages containing spirituous liquor other than that produced at the distillery, the distillery shall obtain a mixed beverages permit pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001

.

(4b)

If the distillery is located on a property used for bona fide farm purposes, as defined in G.S. 160D-102(3), sell mixed beverages containing only spirituous liquor produced at the distillery for consumption on the premises regardless of the results of any local mixed beverage election.

Conduct consumer tastings, sell mixed beverages, and provide spirituous liquor in closed containers in accordance with

G.S. 18B-1114.7

.

Sell malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine, for consumption on the premises upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

Distilleries for Fuel Alcohol. — Any person in possession of a Federal Operating Permit pursuant to Title 27, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 19 (April 1, 2010 Edition), shall obtain a fuel alcohol permit before manufacturing any alcohol. The permit shall entitle the permittee to perform only those acts allowed by the Federal Operating Permit, and all conditions of the Federal Operating Permit shall apply to the State permit.

Tax Compliance. — By October 1 of each year, the Commission shall confirm the holder of a distillery permit is in compliance with G.S. 18B-900(a)(8). The provisions of G.S. 18B-900(f) apply to the confirmation required under this subsection, except that the Commission may suspend a person’s distillery permit until the Commission receives notice from the Department of Revenue that the person is in compliance.

Control of Location of Sale and Consumption on Premises. — Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-301(e), except as otherwise prohibited by federal law or the holder of the distillery permit, an alcoholic beverage authorized to be sold or consumed under this section may be sold, possessed, or consumed on any part of the licensed premises of the distillery. This section shall not be construed to allow spirituous liquor in closed containers sold for off-premises consumption to be consumed at the distillery.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1329, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1989, c. 800, s. 5; 2012-201, s. 10; 2015-98, s. 4(a); 2015-262, s. 3(a); 2017-87, ss. 1(a), 16(b); 2019-182, ss. 1(b), 2, 4(a); 2021-117, ss. 12(c), 12(d); 2021-150, ss. 2.2, 6.1(a), 6.2(h), 8.1, 9.1(a), 9.3(a), 18.1.

§ 18B-1105.1.
Authorization of liquor importer/bottler permit.

The holder of a liquor importer/bottler permit may:

Receive spirituous liquor in closed containers into foreign trade zones at the State Port facilities in Morehead City and Wilmington from ships docked at the State Port facilities for the purpose of bottling, packaging, or labeling.

Bottle, package, or label in this State spirituous liquor imported or received into a foreign trade zone pursuant to this section.

Receive spirituous liquor in closed containers into the foreign trade zones at the State Port facilities in Morehead City and Wilmington from ships docked at the State Port facilities for storage, sale, shipment, and transshipment to the State or a local ABC board warehouse or, subject to the laws of other jurisdictions, to private or public agencies or establishments of other states or nations.

Subject to the record-keeping requirements of

G.S. 18B-1115

, transport into or out of the foreign trade zones at the State Port facilities in Morehead City and Wilmington, the maximum amount of liquor allowed under federal law, if the transportation is related to the bottling, packaging, labeling, sale, or storage permitted by this section.

History.

1995, c. 404, s. 1.

§ 18B-1106.
Authorization of wine importer permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a wine importer permit may:

Import fortified and unfortified wines from outside the United States in closed containers;

Store those wines;

Sell those wines to wine wholesalers for purposes of resale.

Distribution Agreements. — Wine distribution agreements are governed by Article 12 of this Chapter.

The holder of a wine importer permit may import and sell to wholesalers only wine for which it is a primary American source of supply. To be considered a primary American source of supply, a wine importer must establish that it has lawfully purchased the wine from the winery, or from an agent of the winery, and by written contract or otherwise has been authorized by the winery to distribute the wine to wholesalers in the United States.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1983, c. 85, s. 1; 1993, c. 415, s. 21; 2006-227, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-227, s. 11, effective August 10, 2006, added subsection (c).

§ 18B-1107.
Authorization of wine wholesaler permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a wine wholesaler permit may:

Receive, possess and transport shipments of fortified and unfortified wine. The wine must be received from one of the following:

A primary American source of supply for that wine as recognized by the Commission or as verified by the wholesaler.

A licensed North Carolina wholesaler who received the wine from a primary American source of supply and with whom the second wholesaler has a subcontracting agreement for distribution of the wine.

Another wholesaler from whom the purchasing wholesaler is purchasing the wholesaler’s business or from whom the wholesaler is purchasing the brand or distribution rights for the wine being received.

Another wholesaler who also has distribution rights for the wine being received and from whom the wholesaler is acquiring the wine in order to address a temporary inventory shortage.

Sell, deliver and ship wine in closed containers for purposes of resale to wholesalers or retailers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws.

Furnish and sell wine to its employees, subject to the rules of the Commission and the Department of Revenue.

In locations where the sale is legal, furnish wine to guests and any other person who does not hold an ABC permit, for promotional purposes, subject to rules of the Commission.

Sell out-of-date unfortified and fortified wines to holders of cider and vinegar manufacturer permits, provided that each bottle is marked “out-of-date” by the wholesaler.

Distribution Agreements. — Wine distribution agreements are governed by Article 12 of this Chapter.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1983, c. 85, s. 1; 1997-134, s. 4; 2006-227, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-227, s. 12, effective August 10, 2006, rewrote subdivision (a)(1) adding items a. to d. and making stylistic changes.

§ 18B-1108.
Authorization of malt beverages importer permit.

The holder of a malt beverages importer permit may:

Import malt beverages from outside the United States in closed containers;

Store those malt beverages;

Sell those malt beverages to malt beverage wholesalers for purposes of resale.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1993, c. 415, s. 22.

§ 18B-1109.
Authorization of malt beverages wholesaler permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a malt beverages wholesaler permit may:

Receive, possess and transport shipments of malt beverages;

Sell, deliver and ship, in closed containers and in quantities of one case or container or more, malt beverages of any brand filed pursuant to G.S. 18B-1303(a), to wholesalers or retailers licensed under this Chapter, as authorized by the ABC laws;

Furnish and sell malt beverages filed pursuant to G.S. 18B-1303(a) to its employees subject to the rules of the Commission and the Department of Revenue;

In locations where the sale is legal, furnish malt beverages of any brand filed pursuant to G.S. 18B-1303(a) to guests and any other person who does not hold an ABC permit, for promotional purposes, subject to the rules of the Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 142, s. 3.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; c. 747, s. 62; 1989, c. 142, s. 3; 1991, c. 459, s. 8.

§ 18B-1110.
Authorization of bottler permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a bottler permit may:

Receive, possess and transport shipments of malt beverages, unfortified wine and fortified wine;

Bottle, sell, deliver and ship malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine in closed containers to wholesalers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws;

Furnish or sell packages which do not conform to the manufacturer’s marketing standards, if State taxes have been or will be paid, to its employees for the use of the employees or their families and guests in this State.A sale or gift under subdivision (3) shall not be considered a retail or wholesale sale under the ABC law.

Distribution Agreements. — Wine distribution agreements are governed by Article 12 of this Chapter.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1983, c. 85, s. 1.

§ 18B-1111.
Authorization of salesman permit.

Authorized Acts. — The holder of a salesman permit may sell and transport malt beverages for a malt beverage wholesaler or sell and transport unfortified and fortified wine for a wine wholesaler.

Persons Required to Obtain Permit. — All route salesmen and salesmen working at a wholesaler’s warehouse shall obtain the permit described in this section. All salesmen shall be at least 21 years old.

Validity Period. — A salesman permit shall be valid as provided in G.S. 18B-903(a), except that it shall be valid only so long as the salesman is employed by the same wholesaler.

History.

1951, c. 378, ss. 1, 2, 5-8; 1963, c. 426, s. 13; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1975, c. 330, s. 2; c. 411, s. 8; 1981, c. 412, s. 2.

§ 18B-1112.
Authorization of vendor representative permit.

Authorized Acts. — The holder of a vendor representative permit may represent an unfortified winery, fortified winery, limited winery, brewery, bottler, importer, nonresident malt beverage vendor, or nonresident wine vendor, either as an employee or an agent, to solicit orders for that commercial permittee’s product. The vendor representative may sell, deliver, and ship alcoholic beverages in this State only to permittees to whom the commercial permittee he represents may sell, deliver, or ship.

Number of Permits. — A vendor representative shall secure a separate permit for each commercial permittee he represents. A permit may not be issued without the approval of the commercial permittee.

History.

1981, c. 747, s. 63; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, s. 21.

§ 18B-1113.
Authorization of nonresident malt beverage vendor permit.

The holder of a nonresident malt beverage vendor permit may sell, deliver, and ship malt beverages in this State only to wholesalers, importers, and bottlers licensed under this Chapter, as authorized by the ABC laws. The malt beverages must come to rest at the licensed premises of a malt beverage wholesaler in this State before being resold to a retailer. A nonresident malt beverage vendor permit may be issued to a brewery, an importer, or a bottler outside North Carolina who desires to sell, deliver, and ship malt beverages into this State.

History.

1981, c. 747, s. 63; 1993, c. 415, s. 23.

§ 18B-1113.1.
Authorization of optional nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit.

The following businesses may apply for and obtain a nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit:

A business located outside the State that is licensed or permitted to manufacture spirituous liquor in the jurisdiction where the business is located and whose products are lawfully sold in this State.

A brokerage.

A liquor importer/bottler.

The holder of a nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit may sell, deliver, and ship spirituous liquor that has been approved for sale in this State to the permit holder’s (i) employees in the State and (ii) brokerage if the brokerage also holds a nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit for the purposes of conducting special events pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1114.7

. The permit holder may not ship or deliver more spirituous liquor to its employees or brokerage than is necessary for any consumer tasting event scheduled within one calendar month of the shipment or delivery. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require a business to possess or obtain a nonresident spirituous liquor vendor permit to do business in the State or to obtain a spirituous liquor special event permit pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1114.7

.

For purposes of this section, “brokerage” means a business that brokers the sale of spirituous liquor on behalf of a distillery or liquor importer/bottler, and “distillery” means the holder of a distillery permit issued under

G.S. 18B-1105

or a business located outside the State that is licensed or permitted to manufacture spirituous liquor in the jurisdiction where the business is located and whose products are lawfully sold in this State.

History.

2021-150, s. 6.2(a).

§ 18B-1114.
Authorization of nonresident wine vendor permit.

The holder of a nonresident wine vendor permit may sell, deliver, and ship unfortified and fortified wine in this State only to wholesalers, importers, and bottlers licensed under this Chapter, as authorized by the ABC laws. The unfortified and fortified wine must come to rest at the licensed premises of a wine wholesaler in this State before being resold to a retailer. A nonresident wine vendor permit may be issued to a winery, a wholesaler, an importer, or a bottler outside North Carolina who desires to sell, deliver, and ship unfortified and fortified wine into this State. The holder of a nonresident wine vendor permit may sell, deliver, and ship into this State only wine for which it is a primary American source of supply. To be considered a primary American source of supply, a nonresident wine vendor must establish that it has lawfully purchased the wine from the winery, or from an agent of the winery, and by written contract or otherwise has been authorized by the winery to distribute the wine to wholesalers in the United States.

History.

1981, c. 747, s. 63; 1993, c. 415, s. 24; 2006-227, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-227, s. 13, effective August 10, 2006, added the last two sentences.

§ 18B-1114.1.
Authorization of winery special event permit.

Authorization. — The holder of an unfortified winery permit, a limited winery permit, a viticulture/enology course authorization, a wine producer permit, or a vendor representative permit may obtain a winery special event permit allowing the winery or wine producer to give free tastings of its wine; to sell branded merchandise such as glassware, cups, signs, t-shirts, hats, and other apparel; and to sell its wine by the glass or in closed containers, at shopping malls and at trade shows, conventions, wine festivals, street festivals, holiday festivals, agricultural festivals, farmers markets, balloon races, local fund-raisers, and other similar events approved by the Commission.

Limitation. — A winery special event permit is valid only in a jurisdiction that has approved the establishment of ABC stores or has approved the sale of unfortified wine.

History.

1989, c. 737, s. 2; 1991, c. 267, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1007, s. 24; 1993, c. 553, s. 71; 2001-262, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 49(e); 2005-350, s. 3(b); 2017-87, s. 18; 2017-108, s. 19; 2017-212, s. 8.1; 2018-100, s. 6(a); 2021-150, s. 6.2(e).

§ 18B-1114.2.
Effect of cider and vinegar manufacturer permit.

The holder of a cider and vinegar manufacturer permit may purchase and transport unlimited quantities of out-of-date unfortified or fortified wines from wine wholesalers for the sole purpose of manufacturing a food product item. Any manufacturer of cider or vinegar may apply for this permit.

History.

1997-134, s. 2.

§ 18B-1114.3.
Authorization of wine producer permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a wine producer permit may:

Ship crops grown on land owned by it in North Carolina to a winery, inside or outside the State, for the manufacture and bottling of unfortified wine from those crops and may receive that wine back in closed containers.

Sell, deliver, and ship the unfortified wine manufactured from its crops in closed containers to wholesalers and retailers licensed under this Chapter as authorized by the ABC laws and also sell to exporters and nonresident wholesalers when the purchase is not for resale in this State.

Regardless of the results of any local wine election, sell the wine manufactured from its crops for on- or off-premise consumption upon obtaining the appropriate permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

.

Limitation on Sales. — The holder of a wine producer permit may not sell, in total, annually, more than 20,000 gallons of wine manufactured off its premises from crops it has grown.

History.

2001-262, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 49(c).

§ 18B-1114.4.
Viticulture/Enology course authorization.

Authorization. — The holder of a viticulture/enology course authorization may:

Manufacture wine from grapes grown on the school’s campus or the school’s contracted or leased property for the purpose of providing instruction and education on the making of unfortified wines.

Possess wines manufactured during the viticulture/enology program for the purpose of conducting wine-tasting seminars and classes for students who are 21 years of age or older.

Sell wines produced during the course to wholesalers or to retailers upon obtaining a wine wholesaler permit under

G.S. 18B-1107

, except that the permittee may not receive shipments of wines from other producers.

Sell wines produced during the course, upon obtaining a permit under

G.S. 18B-1001(4)

.

Limitation. — Authorization for a viticulture/enology course shall be granted by the Commission only for a community college or college that offers a viticulture/enology program as a part of its curriculum offerings for students of the school. Wines may be manufactured only from grapes grown in a viticulture/enology course vineyard that is located on the school’s campus or the school’s contracted or leased property.

The holder of a viticulture/enology course authorization who obtains a wine wholesaler permit under

G.S. 18B-1107

subject to the limitation in subsection (a) of this section may obtain a winery special event permit under

G.S. 18B-1114.1

, and where the permit is valid may participate in approved events and sell at retail at those events any wine produced incident to the operation of the viticulture/enology program. The holder of a viticulture/enology course authorization may participate in not more than six winery special events within a 12-month period and may sell up to 25 cases of wine at each event. Net proceeds from the program’s retail sale of wine pursuant to this subsection shall be retained by the school and used for support of the viticulture/enology program.

The holder of a viticulture/enology course authorization shall not be considered a winery for the purposes of this Chapter or Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

History.

2002-102, s. 1; 2005-350, s. 3(a); 2009-539, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-350, s. 3(a), effective September 7, 2005, inserted “the school’s contracted or” in subdivision (a)(1); in subsection (b), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “No retail sales of wine shall be made by the students, instructor, or school,” and in the present second sentence, deleted “not to exceed five acres” following “course vineyard” and inserted “the school’s contracted or”; and rewrote subsection (c).

Session Laws 2009-539, s. 2, effective August 28, 2009, added subdivision (a)(4).